California statutes. Penal Code
(e) (1) Subject to the provisions of this section, the parole authority, in the absence of a new conviction and commitment of the parolee to the state prison under other provisions of law, may assign a parolee who violates a condition of his or her parole to parole programs or
 services in lieu of revocation of parole.

(2) In addition to the alternatives provided in this section, the parole authority may, as an alternative to ordering a revoked parolee returned to custody, suspend the period of revocation pending the parolee’s successful completion of parole programs or services assigned by the parole authority.

(3) The department shall not establish a special condition of parole, assigning a parolee to parole programs or services in lieu of initiating revocation proceedings, if the department reasonably believes that the violation of the condition of parole involves commission of a serious felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, or a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, or involves the control or use of a firearm.

(f) A special condition of
 parole imposed pursuant to this section to participate in residential programs shall not be established without a hearing by the parole authority in accordance with Section 3068 and regulations of the parole authority. A special condition of parole providing an assignment to a parole program or service that does not consist of a residential component may be established without a hearing.

(g) Expansion of parole programs or services pursuant to this section by the department is subject to the appropriation of funding for this purpose as provided in the Budget Act of 2007, and subsequent budget acts.

(h) The department, in consultation with the Legislative Analyst’s Office, shall, contingent upon funding, conduct an evaluation regarding the effect of parole programs or services on public safety, parolee recidivism, and prison and parole costs and report the results to the
 Legislature three years after funding is provided pursuant to subdivision (g). Until that date, the department shall report annually to the Legislature, beginning January 1, 2009, regarding the status of the expansion of parole programs or services and the number of offenders assigned and participating in parole programs or services in the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3062.

The Governor of the state shall have like power to revoke the parole of any prisoner. The written authority of the Governor shall likewise be sufficient to authorize any peace officer to retake and return any prisoner to the state prison. The Governor’s written order revoking the parole shall have the same force and effect and be executed in like manner as the order of the parole authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 695, Sec. 18.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.

No parole shall be suspended or revoked without cause, which cause must be stated in the order suspending or revoking the parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in subdivision (d), parole shall not be suspended or revoked for commission of a nonviolent drug possession offense or for violating any drug-related condition of parole.

As an additional condition of parole for all such offenses or violations, the Parole Authority shall require participation in and completion of an appropriate drug treatment program. Vocational training, family counseling and literacy training may be imposed as additional parole conditions.

The Parole Authority may require any person on parole who commits a nonviolent drug possession offense or violates any drug-related
 condition of parole, and who is reasonably able to do so, to contribute to the cost of his or her own placement in a drug treatment program.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to:

(1) Any parolee who has been convicted of one or more serious or violent felonies in violation of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 or Section 1192.7.

(2) A parolee who, while on parole, commits one or more nonviolent drug possession offenses and is found to have concurrently committed a misdemeanor not related to the use of drugs or any felony.

(3) A parolee who refuses drug treatment as a condition of parole.

(c) Within seven days of a finding that the parolee has either committed a nonviolent drug possession
 offense or violated any drug-related condition of parole, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations shall notify the treatment provider designated to provide drug treatment under subdivision (a). Within 30 days thereafter the treatment provider shall prepare an individualized drug treatment plan and forward it to the Parole Authority and to the California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations agent responsible for supervising the parolee. On a quarterly basis after the parolee begins drug treatment, the treatment provider shall prepare and forward a progress report on the individual parolee to these entities and individuals.

(1) If at any point during the course of drug treatment the treatment provider notifies the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations that the parolee is unamenable to the drug treatment provided,
 but amenable to other drug treatments or related programs, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations may act to modify the terms of parole to ensure that the parolee receives the alternative drug treatment or program.

(2) If at any point during the course of drug treatment the treatment provider notifies the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations that the parolee is unamenable to the drug treatment provided and all other forms of drug treatment provided pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1210 and the amenability factors described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 1210.1, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations may act to revoke parole. At the revocation hearing, parole may be revoked if it is proved that the parolee is unamenable to all drug treatment.

(3) Drug treatment services provided by subdivision (a) as a required condition of parole may not exceed 12 months, unless the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations makes a finding supported by the record that the continuation of treatment services beyond 12 months is necessary for drug treatment to be successful. If that finding is made, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations may order up to two six-month extensions of treatment services. The provision of treatment services under this act shall not exceed 24 months.

(d) (1) If parole is revoked pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, the defendant may be incarcerated pursuant to otherwise applicable law without regard to the provisions of this section. Parole shall be revoked if the parole violation is proved and
 a preponderance of the evidence establishes that the parolee poses a danger to the safety of others.

(2) If a parolee receives drug treatment under subdivision (a), and during the course of drug treatment violates parole either by committing an offense other than a nonviolent drug possession offense, or by violating a non-drug-related condition of parole, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations acts to revoke parole, a hearing shall be conducted to determine whether parole shall be revoked.

Parole may be modified or revoked if the parole violation is proved.

(3) (A) If a parolee receives drug treatment under subdivision (a), and during the course of drug treatment violates parole either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or a misdemeanor for simple
 possession or use of drugs or drug paraphernalia, being present where drugs are used, or failure to register as a drug offender, or any activity similar to those listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1210, or by violating a drug-related condition of parole, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations acts to revoke parole, a hearing shall be conducted to determine whether parole shall be revoked. Parole shall be revoked if the parole violation is proved and a preponderance of the evidence establishes that the parolee poses a danger to the safety of others. If parole is not revoked, the conditions of parole may be intensified to achieve the goals of drug treatment.

(B) If a parolee receives drug treatment under subdivision (a), and during the course of drug treatment for the second time violates that parole either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or by violating a drug-related
 condition of parole, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations acts for a second time to revoke parole, a hearing shall be conducted to determine whether parole shall be revoked. If the alleged parole violation is proved, the parolee is not eligible for continued parole under any provision of this section and may be reincarcerated.

(C) If a parolee already on parole at the effective date of this act violates that parole either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or a misdemeanor for simple possession or use of drugs or drug paraphernalia, being present where drugs are used, or failure to register as a drug offender, or any activity similar to those listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 1210, or by violating a drug-related condition of parole, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations acts to revoke parole, a hearing
 shall be conducted to determine whether parole shall be revoked. Parole shall be revoked if the parole violation is proved and a preponderance of the evidence establishes that the parolee poses a danger to the safety of others. If parole is not revoked, the conditions of parole may be modified to include participation in a drug treatment program as provided in subdivision (a). This paragraph does not apply to any parolee who at the effective date of this act has been convicted of one or more serious or violent felonies in violation of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 or Section 1192.7.

(D) If a parolee already on parole at the effective date of this act violates that parole for the second time either by committing a nonviolent drug possession offense, or by violating a drug-related condition of parole, and the parole authority acts for a second time to revoke parole, a hearing shall be conducted to determine whether parole shall be revoked. If
 the alleged parole violation is proved, the parolee may be reincarcerated or the conditions of parole may be intensified to achieve the goals of drug treatment.

(e) The term “drug-related condition of parole” shall include a parolee’s specific drug treatment regimen, and, if ordered by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations pursuant to this section, employment, vocational training, educational programs, psychological counseling, and family counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 398.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.2.

In a case where a parolee had been ordered to undergo drug treatment as a condition of parole pursuant to Section 3063.1, any drug testing of the parolee shall be used as a treatment tool. In evaluating a parolee’s treatment program, results of any drug testing shall be given no greater weight than any other aspects of the parolee’s individual treatment program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 721, Sec. 6.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.5.

In parole revocation or revocation extension proceedings, a parolee or his or her attorney shall receive a copy of any police, arrest, and crime reports, criminal history information, and child abuse reports made pursuant to Sections 11166 and 11166.2 pertaining to those proceedings. Portions of those reports containing confidential information need not be disclosed if the parolee or his or her attorney has been notified that confidential information has not been disclosed. Portions of child abuse reports made pursuant to Sections 11166 and 11166.2 containing
 identifying information relating to the reporter shall not be disclosed. However, the parolee or his or her attorney shall be notified that information relating to the identity of the reporter has not been disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 99, Sec. 1.   Effective July 21, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.6.

Parole revocation proceedings and parole revocation extension proceedings may be conducted by a panel of one person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 695, Sec. 19.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

3064.

From and after the suspension or revocation of the parole of any prisoner and until his return to custody he is an escapee and fugitive from justice and no part of the time during which he is an escapee and fugitive from justice shall be part of his term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

3065.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 1170.2 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of this chapter, the provisions of this article are to apply to all prisoners serving sentence in the state prisons on July 1, 1977, to the end that at all times the same provisions relating to sentence, imprisonments and paroles of prisoners shall apply to all the inmates thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3066.

Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the Government Code, Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to a parole hearing or other adjudication concerning rights of an inmate or parolee conducted by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the Board of Parole Hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 19.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3067.

(a) Any inmate who is eligible for release on parole pursuant to this chapter or postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) of Part 3 shall be given notice that he or she is subject to terms and conditions of his or her release from prison.

(b) The notice shall include all of the following:

(1) The person’s release date and the maximum period the person may be subject to supervision under this title.

(2) An advisement that if the person violates any law or violates any condition of his or her release that he or she may be incarcerated in a county jail or, if previously paroled pursuant to Section 3000.1 or paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000, returned to state prison, regardless of whether new charges are filed.

(3) An advisement that he or she is subject to search or seizure by a probation or parole officer or other peace officer at any time of the day or night, with or without a search warrant or with or without cause.

(c) This section shall only apply to an inmate who is eligible for release on parole for an offense committed
 on or after January 1, 1997.

(d) It is not the intent of the Legislature to authorize law enforcement officers to conduct searches for the sole purpose of harassment.

(e) This section does not affect the power of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to prescribe and amend rules and regulations pursuant to Section 5058.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 49.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3068.

(a) The Department of Corrections shall operate the Preventing Parolee Crime Program with various components, including, at a minimum, residential and nonresidential multiservice centers, literacy labs, drug treatment networks, and job placement assistance for parolees.

(b) The Department of Corrections shall, commencing in the 1998–99 fiscal year, initiate an expansion of the program to parole units now lacking some or all of the elements of the program, where doing so would be
 cost-effective, as determined by the Director of Corrections, to the extent that funding for the expansion becomes available.

(c) In addition to the assignment by the Department of Corrections of any other parolee to the Preventing Parolee Crime Program, the parole authority may assign a conditionally released or paroled prisoner to the Preventing Parolee Crime Program in lieu of the revocation of parole. The parole authority shall not assign a conditionally released or paroled prisoner to the Preventing Parolee Crime Program in lieu of the revocation of parole if the person has committed a parole violation involving a violent or serious felony. A special condition of parole that requires the parolee to participate in a live-in program shall not be imposed without a hearing by the Board of Prison Terms.

(d) (1) The Department of Corrections, in consultation
 with the Board of Prison Terms and the Legislative Analyst’s office, shall, contingent upon funding, contract with an independent consultant to conduct an evaluation regarding the impact of an expansion of the Preventing Parolee Crime Program to additional parole units on public safety, parolee recidivism, and prison and parole costs, and report the results to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2004.

(2) The Department of Corrections shall sample several parole units in which the program has been added to examine the program’s impact upon the supervision, control, and sanction of parolees under the jurisdiction of the sampled parole units. These results shall be compared with a control group of comparable parole populations that do not have Preventing Parolee Crime Program services.

(3) The report, whether in final or draft form, and all working papers and data, shall be
 available for immediate review upon request by the Legislative Analyst.

(4) The department in consultation with the Board of Prison Terms shall submit a multiyear evaluation plan for the program to the Legislature six months after an appropriation is made for the evaluation provided for in paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 526, Sec. 2.   Effective September 16, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

3069.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is hereby authorized to create the Parole Violation Intermediate Sanctions (PVIS) program. The purpose of the program shall be to improve the rehabilitation of parolees, reduce recidivism, reduce prison overcrowding, and improve public safety through the use of intermediate sanctions for offenders who violate parole. The PVIS program will allow the department to provide parole agents an early opportunity to intervene with parolees who are not in compliance with the conditions of parole and
 facing return to prison. The program will include key components used by drug and collaborative courts under a highly structured model, including close supervision and monitoring by a hearing officer, dedicated calendars, nonadversarial proceedings, frequent appearances before the hearing officer, utilization of incentives and sanctions, frequent drug and alcohol testing, immediate entry into treatment and rehabilitation programs, and close collaboration between the program, parole, and treatment to improve offender outcomes. The program shall be local and community based.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) “Parole authority” means the Board of Parole Hearings.

(3) “Program” means
 the Parole Violation Intermediate Sanctions program.

(c) (1) A parolee who is deemed eligible by the department to participate in this program, and who would otherwise be referred to the parole authority to have his or her parole revoked for a parole violation shall be referred by his or her parole officer for participation in the program in lieu of parole revocation.

(2) If the alleged violation of parole involves the commission of a serious felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, or a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, or involves the control or use of a firearm, the parolee shall not be eligible for referral to the program in lieu of revocation of parole.

(d) The department is authorized to establish local PVIS programs. Each local program may
 have, but shall not be limited to, the following characteristics:

(1) An assigned hearing officer who is a retired superior court judge or commissioner and who is experienced in using the drug court model and collaborative court model.

(2) The use of a dedicated calendar.

(3) Close coordination between the hearing officer, department, counsel, community treatment and rehabilitation programs participating in the program and adherence to a team approach in working with parolees.

(4) Enhanced accountability through the use of frequent program appearances by parolees in the program, at least one per month, with more frequent appearances in the time period immediately following the initial referral to the program and thereafter in the discretion of the
 hearing officer.

(5) Reviews of progress by the parolee as to his or her treatment and rehabilitation plan and abstinence from the use of drugs and alcohol through progress reports provided by the parole agent as well as all treatment and rehabilitation providers.

(6) Mandatory frequent drug and alcohol testing.

(7) Graduated in-custody sanctions may be imposed after a hearing in which it is found the parolee failed treatment and rehabilitation programs or continued in the use of drugs or alcohol while in the program.

(8) A problemsolving focus and team approach to decisionmaking.

(9) Direct interaction between the parolee and the hearing officer.

(10) Accessibility of the hearing officer to parole agents and parole employees as well as treatment and rehabilitation providers.

(e) Upon successful completion of the program, the parolee shall continue on parole, or be granted other relief as shall be determined in the sole discretion of the department or as authorized by law.

(f) The department is authorized to develop the programs. The parole authority is directed to convene in each county where the programs are selected to be established, all local stakeholders, including, but not limited to, a retired superior court judge or commissioner, designated by the Administrative Office of the Courts, who shall be compensated by the department at the present rate of pay for retired judges and commissioners, local parole agents and other parole employees, the district
 attorney, the public defender, an attorney actively representing parolees in the county and a private defense attorney designated by the public defenders association, the county director of alcohol and drug services, behavioral health, mental health, and any other local stakeholders deemed appropriate. Specifically, persons directly involved in the areas of substance abuse treatment, cognitive skills development, education, life skills, vocational training and support, victim impact awareness, anger management, family reunification, counseling, residential care, placement in affordable housing, employment development and placement are encouraged to be included in the meeting.

(g) The department, in consultation with local stakeholders, shall develop a plan that is consistent with this section. The plan shall address at a minimum the following components:

(1) The method by which
 each parolee eligible for the program shall be referred to the program.

(2) The method by which each parolee is to be individually assessed as to his or her treatment and rehabilitative needs and level of community and court monitoring required, participation of counsel, and the development of a treatment and rehabilitation plan for each parolee.

(3) The specific treatment and rehabilitation programs that will be made available to the parolees and the process to ensure that they receive the appropriate level of treatment and rehabilitative services.

(4) The criteria for continuing participation in, and successful completion of, the program, as well as the criteria for termination from the program and return to the parole revocation process.

(5) The
 development of a program team, as well as a plan for ongoing training in utilizing the drug court and collaborative court nonadversarial model.

(h) (1) If a parolee is referred to the program by his or her parole agent, as specified in this section, the hearing officer in charge of the local program to which the parolee is referred shall determine whether the parolee will be admitted to the program.

(2) A parolee may be excluded from admission to the program if the hearing officer determines that the parolee poses a risk to the community or would not benefit from the program. The hearing officer may consider the history of the offender, the nature of the committing offense, and the nature of the violation. The hearing officer shall state its findings, and the reasons for those findings, on the record.

(3) If the hearing officer agrees to admit the parolee into the program, any pending parole revocation proceedings shall be suspended contingent upon successful completion of the program as determined by the program hearing officer.

(i) A special condition of parole imposed as a condition of admission into the program consisting of a residential program shall not be established without a hearing in front of the hearing officer in accordance with Section 3068 and regulations of the parole authority. A special condition of parole providing an admission to the program that does not consist of a residential component may be established without a hearing.

(j) Implementation of this section by the department is subject to the appropriation of funding for this purpose as provided in the Budget Act of 2008, and subsequent budget acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3069.5.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Legislative Analyst’s Office, shall, contingent upon funding, conduct an evaluation of the PVIS program.

(b) A final report shall be due to the Legislature three years after funding is provided pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 3069. Until that date, the department shall report annually to the Legislature, beginning January 1, 2009, regarding the status of implementation of the PVIS program and the number of offenders assigned and
 participating in the program in the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 645, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3070.

The Department of Corrections shall develop and report, utilizing existing resources, to the Legislature by December 31, 2000, a plan that would ensure by January 1, 2005, that all prisoners and parolees who are substance abusers receive appropriate treatment, including therapeutic community and academic programs. The plan shall include a range of options, estimated capital outlay and operating costs for the various options, and a recommended prioritization, including which persons shall receive priority for treatment, for phased implementation of the
 plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 526, Sec. 3.   Effective September 16, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

3071.

The Department of Corrections shall implement, by January 1, 2002, a course of instruction for the training of parole officers in California in the management of parolees who were convicted of stalking pursuant to Section 646.9. The course shall include instruction in the appropriate protocol for notifying and interacting with stalking victims, especially in regard to a stalking offender’s release from parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 564, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3072.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, subject to the legislative appropriation of the necessary funds, may establish and operate, after January 1, 2007, a specialized sex offender treatment pilot program for inmates whom the department determines pose a high risk to the public of committing violent sex crimes.

(b) (1) The program shall be based upon the relapse prevention model and shall include referral to specialized services, such as substance abuse treatment, for offenders needing those specialized services.

(2) Except as otherwise required under Section 645, the department may provide medication treatments for selected offenders, as determined by medical protocols, and only on a voluntary basis and with the offender’s informed consent.

(c) (1) The program shall be targeted primarily at adult sex offenders who meet the following conditions:

(A) The offender is within five years of being released on parole. An inmate serving a life term may be excluded from treatment until he or she receives a parole date and is within five years of that parole date, unless the
 department determines that the treatment is necessary for the public safety.

(B) The offender has been clinically assessed.

(C) A review of the offender’s criminal history indicates that the offender poses a high risk of committing new sex offenses upon his or her release on parole.

(D) Based upon the clinical assessment, the offender may be amenable to treatment.

(2) The department may include other appropriate offenders in the treatment program if doing so facilitates the effectiveness of the treatment program.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, inmates who are condemned to death or sentenced to life without the possibility of parole are ineligible to participate in
 treatment.

(d) The program under this section shall be established with the assistance and supervision of the staff of the department primarily by obtaining the services of specially trained sex offender treatment providers, as determined by the secretary of the department and the Director of State Hospitals.

(e) (1) The program under this section, upon full implementation, shall provide for the treatment of inmates who are deemed to pose a high risk to the public of committing sex crimes, as determined by the State-Authorized Risk Assessment Tool for Sex Offenders, pursuant to Sections 290.04 to 290.06, inclusive.

(2) To the maximum extent that is practical and feasible, offenders participating in the treatment program shall be held in a separate area of the prison facility, segregated from any non-sex offenders
 held at the same prison, and treatment in the pilot program shall be provided in program space segregated, to the maximum extent that is practical and feasible, from program space for any non-sex offenders held at the same prison.

(f) (1) The State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, by January 1, 2012, shall provide a report evaluating the program to the fiscal and public safety policy committees of both houses of the Legislature, and to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(2) The report shall initially evaluate whether the program under this section is operating effectively, is having a positive clinical effect on participating sex offenders, and is cost effective for the state.

(3) In conducting its evaluation, the State Department of Mental Health, or its
 successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall consider the effects of treatment of offenders while in prison and while subsequently on parole.

(4) The State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall advise the Legislature as to whether the program should be continued past its expiration date, expanded, or concluded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 47.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3073.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is hereby authorized to obtain day treatment, and to contract for crisis care services, for parolees with mental health problems. Day treatment and crisis care services should be designed to reduce parolee recidivism and the chances that a parolee will return to prison. The department shall work with counties to obtain day treatment and crisis care services for parolees with the goal of extending the services upon completion of the offender’s period of parole, if needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 7, Sec. 12.   Effective May 3, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3073.1.

Counties are hereby authorized to contract with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in order to obtain correctional clinical services for inmates with mental health problems who are released on postrelease community supervision with mental health problems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 26.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. County Boards of Parole Commissioners [3074. - 3089.]

3074.

The Legislature finds and declares that the period immediately following incarceration is critical to successful reintegration of the offender into society and to positive citizenship. It is in the interest of public safety for a county to provide for the supervision of parolees, and to provide educational, vocational, family and personal counseling necessary to assist parolees in the transition between imprisonment and discharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

3075.

(a) There is in each county a board of parole commissioners, consisting of each of the following:

(1) The sheriff, or his or her designee, or, in a county with a department of corrections, the director of that department.

(2) The probation officer, or his or her designee.

(3) A member, not a public official, to be selected from the public by the presiding judge of the superior court.

(b) The public member of the county board of parole commissioners or his or her alternate shall be entitled to his or her actual traveling and other necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of his or her duties. In addition, the public member or his or her alternate shall be entitled to per diem at any rate that may be provided by the board of supervisors. The public member or his or her alternate shall hold office for a term of one year and in no event for a period exceeding three consecutive years. The term shall commence on the date of appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3076.

(a) The board may make, establish and enforce rules and regulations adopted under this article.

(b) The board shall act at regularly called meetings at which two-thirds of the members are present, and shall make and establish rules and regulations in writing stating the reasons therefor under which any prisoner who is confined in or committed to any county jail, work furlough facility, industrial farm, or industrial road camp, or in any city jail, work furlough facility, industrial farm, or industrial road camp under a judgment of imprisonment or as a condition of probation for any criminal offense, unless the court at the time of committing has ordered that such prisoner confined as a condition of probation upon conviction of a felony not be granted parole, may be allowed to go upon parole outside of such jail, work furlough facility, industrial farm, or industrial road camp, but to remain, while on parole, in the legal custody and under the control of the board establishing the rules and regulations for the prisoner’s parole, and subject at any time to be taken back within the enclosure of any such jail, work furlough facility, industrial farm, or industrial road camp.

(c) The board shall provide a complete copy of its written rules and regulations and reasons therefor and any amendments thereto to each of the judges of the superior court of the county.

The board shall provide to the persons in charge of the county’s correctional facilities a copy of the sections of its written rules and regulations and any amendments thereto which govern eligibility for parole, and the name and telephone number of the person or agency to contact for additional information. Such rules and regulations governing eligibility either shall be conspicuously posted and maintained within each county correctional facility so that all prisoners have access to a copy, or shall be given to each prisoner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 559.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3077.

Whenever a prisoner is sentenced in one county and incarcerated in another county, only the county in which he was sentenced shall have jurisdiction to grant parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

3078.

(a) The board shall notify the sentencing judge of an inmate’s application for parole.

(b) The sentencing judge may make a recommendation regarding such application, and the board shall give careful consideration to such recommendation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

3079.

(a) No application for parole shall be granted or denied except by a vote of the board at a meeting at which a quorum of its members are present. This paragraph shall not be applied to the denial of applicants who are ineligible by order of the superior court, or to the granting of parole in emergency situations.

(b) An applicant shall be permitted to appear and speak on his behalf at the meeting at which his application is considered by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

3080.

If any paroled prisoner leaves the county in which he is imprisoned without permission from the board granting his parole, he shall be arrested as an escaped prisoner and held as such.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1384.)
-------------------------------------------

3081.

(a) Each county board may retake and imprison any prisoner upon parole granted under the provisions of this article.

(b) Each county board may release any prisoner on parole for a term not to exceed three years upon those conditions and under those rules and regulations as may seem fit and proper for his or her rehabilitation, and should the prisoner so paroled violate any of the conditions of his or her parole or any of the rules and regulations governing his or her parole, he or
 she shall, upon order of the parole commission, be returned to the jail from which he or she was paroled and be confined therein for the unserved portion of his or her sentence.
